Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.060

Removal of commissioners.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner of an authority may be removed by the mayor (or in the case of an authority for a county, by the governing body of said county), but a commissioner shall be removed only after he or she shall have been given a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to the hearing thereon and had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. In the event of the removal of any commissioner, a record of the proceedings, together with the charges and findings thereon, shall be filed in the office of the clerk.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2125; 1965 c 7 s 35.82.060. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 7; RRS s 6889-7. Formerly RCW 74.24.060.]